sk-SK: Prevádzková certifikácia lietadla: Komerčná; EASA AOC; Experimentálna; Časť 135; Súkromná; Iná
hr-HR: Operativna certifikacija zrakoplova: Komercijalno; EASA AOC; Eksperimentalno; Part 135; Privatno; Ostalo
lt-LT: Orlaivių eksploatavimo sertifikavimas: Komercinė; EASA AOC; Eksperimentinė; 135 dalis; Privati; Kita
zh-CN: 飞机运营认证: 商业; EASA AOC; 实验性; 第 135 部 (Part 135); 私人; 其他
da: Operationel certificering af luftfartøjet: Kommerciel; EASA AOC; Eksperimentel; Part 135; Privat; Andet
nb: Operasjonell sertifisering av fly: Kommersiell; EASA AOC; Eksperimentell; Part 135; Privat; Annet
cs: Provozní certifikace letadel: Komerční; EASA AOC; Experimentální; Part 135; Soukromé; Jiné
nl: Operationele certificering vliegtuig: Commercieel; EASA AOC; Experimenteel; Part 135; Privé; Overig
de: Betriebsgenehmigung für Flugzeug: Gewerblich; EASA AOC; Experimentell; Part 135; Privat; Sonstige
fi: Ilma-aluksen käyttösertifiointi: Kaupallinen; EASA AOC; Experimental; Part 135; Yksityinen; Muu
el: Πιστοποίηση λειτουργίας αεροσκαφών: Εμπορικό; EASA AOC; Πειραματικό; Part 135; Ιδιωτικό; Άλλο
sv: Driftcertifiering av flygplan: Kommersiell; EASA AOC; Experimentell; Part 135; Privat; Annan
th: การรับรองปฏิบัติการของอากาศยาน: เชิงพาณิชย์; EASA AOC; ประเภททดลอง; Part 135; ส่วนบุคคล; อื่นๆ
ru: Сертификация воздушного судна на право эксплуатации: Коммерческая; EASA AOC; Экспериментальная; Part 135; Частная; Другое
tr: Uçak işletme sertifikası: Ticari; EASA AOC; Deneysel; Part 135; Özel; Diğer
es: Certificación operativa del avión: Comercial; EASA AOC; Experimental; Parte 135; Privado; Otro
ko: 항공기 운항 인증: 상업용; EASA AOC; 실험용; Part 135; 개인용; 기타
en: Aircraft operational certification: Commercial; EASA AOC; Experimental; Part 135; Private; Other
bg-BG: Оперативно сертифициране на въздухоплавателни средства: Търговски; EASA AOC; Експериментален; Част 135; Частен; Друго
sl-SI: Certificiranje delovanja letala: Komercialno; EASA AOC; Eksperimentalno; Part 135; Zasebno; Drugo
ja: 航空機の操作証明: 商用; EASA AOC; 実験用; Part 135; 自家用; その他
pl: Certyfikacja użytkowania statku powietrznego: Komercyjna; EASA AOC; Eksperymentalna; Part 135; Prywatna; Inne
hu: Repülőgép üzemeltetési tanúsítása: Kereskedelmi; EASA AOC; Kísérleti; Part 135; Magán; Egyéb
ro-RO: Certificarea operațională a aeronavei: Comercial; AOC EASA; Experimental; Partea 135; Privat; Altele
it: Certificazione operativa degli aeromobili: Commerciale; COA EASA; Sperimentale; Part 135; Privato; Altro
pt-PT: Certificação operacional da aeronave: Comercial; AOC da EASA; Experimental; Parte 135; Privado; Outro
zh-TW: 飛機營運認證: 商業; EASA AOC; 實驗性; Part 135; 私人; 其他
vi: Chứng nhận vận hành máy bay: Thương mại; EASA AOC; Thử nghiệm; Part 135; Tư nhân; Khác
pt-BR: Certificação operacional da aeronave: Comercial; EASA AOC; Experimental; Part 135; Privado; Outro
fr: Certification d’exploitation de l’avion: Commercial; EASA AOC; Expérimental; Partie 135; Privé; Autre